Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.500

"Grower," "processor" defined—Application of exemption contained in RCW 20.01.030(1).

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the purposes of RCW 20.01.510 through 20.01.550 the term "grower" and the term "processor" shall have the meanings ascribed thereto by this section:

(1) "Grower" means any person, firm, company, or other organization that is engaged in the production of agricultural crops which must be planted, cultivated, and harvested within a twelve-month period.

(2)(a) "Processor" means any person, firm, company, or other organization that purchases agricultural crops from a grower and who cans, freezes, dries, dehydrates, cooks, presses, powders, or otherwise processes such crops in any manner whatsoever for eventual resale.

(b) The exemption provided for in RCW 20.01.030(1) shall not apply to a cooperative or association as defined therein, which acts as a processor defined herein, and markets such agricultural crops on behalf of the grower or on its own behalf.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 304 s 14; 1971 ex.s. c 182 s 15.]